Kentucky statutes. TITLE III Executive Branch
CHAPTER 14 Department of State

14.010.
Head of department.

The head of the Department of State is the Secretary of State. He shall reside at the seat of government.

History.

4542, 4618-73.

14.020.
Assistant secretary of state.

The Secretary of State, with the approval of the Governor, may appoint an assistant secretary of state, and, with the approval of the Governor, may dismiss him at any time. The assistant, in the absence or disability of the Secretary of State, may do the business of his office in his name.

Before acting under his appointment, the assistant shall take the constitutional oath.

The Secretary of State shall be responsible for the acts of the assistant.

History.

4541, 4541a.

14.025.
Offices within Department of State — Duties.

The Department of State shall be divided into three (3) offices, each headed by an executive director appointed by the Secretary of State pursuant to KRS

12.050

.

The Office of Administration shall be responsible for fiscal and personnel matters, public documents, legal affairs, and special projects and commissions.

The Office of Business Services:

Shall be responsible for all functions of the department relating to business filings, including business entity filings and filings under the Uniform Commercial Code, business records, trademarks and service mark registration, notary appointments, and apostilles; and

May promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A in furtherance of its responsibilities.

The Office of Elections shall be responsible for assisting the Secretary of State in his or her duties as the chief election official of Kentucky and shall be responsible for candidate filings and collection of filing fees.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 379, § 1, effective April 9, 1982; 2011, ch. 29, § 2, effective June 8, 2011; 2021 ch. 185, § 1, effective June 29, 2021.

14.030.
Commonwealth seal, custody of — Seal of Secretary of State.

The Secretary of State shall keep the seal of the Commonwealth, and a seal of office with the following device: The American eagle, in the center, surrounded by the words “Commonwealth of Kentucky, Office of the Secretary of State.”

History.

4537.

Opinions of Attorney General.

The Secretary of State should refuse to give permission to an association to reproduce the design of the seal of the Commonwealth in a decal to be used on trailers and cars. No official approval should be given.

OAG 70-192

.

14.040.
Official acts, how attested.

The Secretary of State shall attest the official acts of the Governor under the seal of the Commonwealth. He shall attest his own official acts under his official seal, and may also use the seal of the Commonwealth to attest any certificate by either himself or the Governor in cases where the seal of the Commonwealth is required to entitle the certificate or anything certified by it to be admitted to record or used as evidence or otherwise in any other state; but where the seal of the Secretary of State is required, the use of the seal of the Commonwealth shall not dispense with that requirement.

History.

4538.

Opinions of Attorney General.

The Secretary of State should refuse to give permission to an association to reproduce the design of the seal of the Commonwealth in a decal to be used on trailers and cars. No official approval should be given.

OAG 70-192

.

14.050.
Custody of public records.

The Secretary of State shall have custody of the books, records, deeds, maps and papers belonging to or deposited in his office, and shall arrange and preserve them.

When a certified copy of a record in the office of the Secretary of State is presented as evidence in any court of this state, by mailing under seal to the clerk of the Circuit Court in the county where it is to be used, it shall be prima facie evidence of the contents of the record, and the personal presence of the Secretary of State as a witness is not necessary.

History.

4545: amend. Acts 1962, ch. 210, § 1.

14.060.
Duty when judge removed from office.

When a judge is removed from office by impeachment or address, the Secretary of State shall so notify in writing the clerk of the court of which he was judge. The notice shall be filed by the clerk in his office, and the order of removal shall be recorded in the Office of the Secretary of State.

History.

4546.

14.070.
Unfinished business of General Assembly.

The Secretary of State, at the close of each session of the General Assembly, shall inspect the papers and documents which remain with the unfinished business, and carefully file in his office such as he considers worthy of preservation, with proper labels designating the session to which they belong.

History.

4544.

14.080.
Interest paid on state bonds.

The Secretary of State shall each month receive from the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet a report of the interest paid on state bonds, and to whom and when paid, and shall record the report in a well-bound book, and carefully file and preserve it. He shall report to each General Assembly, within the first two (2) weeks of its session, the amount of each monthly payment so reported.

History.

4547.

14.090.
Fees.

The Secretary of State shall charge and collect for the state the following fees:

No fee shall be collected for affixing the state seal to a commission issued to any public officer other than commissioner of foreign deeds or notary public, or to a grant, or to a pardon of a felony.

For issuing commission with seal of Commonwealth attached and all necessary forms to a commissioner of foreign deeds $5.00 For issuing remission or respite $2.00 For affixing seal of Commonwealth to all attestations and certificates or furnishing a certified copy of any document by the Secretary of State (per page) $0.50 and for the certificate and affixing the seal thereto $5.00 For each warrant of arrest $2.00

Click to view

History.

1748, 4539, 4543: amend. Acts 1986, ch. 18, § 93, effective July 15, 1986; 1988, ch. 85, § 1, effective July 15, 1988.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

The fee in this section for each filing with the secretary of state required by KRS

355.9-401

has been raised from $3.00 to $8.00 to conform with the amendment to KRS

355.9-401

in 1986 Acts, ch. 204, § 8.

Opinions of Attorney General.

The payment of the filing fee is a condition precedent for filing documents with the Secretary of State, and the Secretary of State may void the filing and return a document after it has been received, stamped, and filed, where the check for payment of that fee has been dishonored.

OAG 89-94

.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Cooperative company, fee for filing declaration of, KRS

272.040

.

Cooperative livestock protective association, fee for filing articles and amendments, KRS

272.400

,

272.410

.

Cooperative marketing association, fee for filing articles or amendments, KRS

272.141

.

Corporations, filing fees, KRS

271B.1-220

.

Land office, fees for duties relating to, KRS

56.300

.

Rural electric cooperative corporations, no fee for affixing seal of commonwealth to articles, KRS

279.190

.

Uniform Commercial Code, secured transactions, filing office fees, KRS

355.9-525

.

14.100.
Record of fees collected — Reports.

The Secretary of State shall, in a separate book, keep accurate and itemized account of all fees received by him.

He shall report to each session of the General Assembly the amount received in licenses, fees and penalties from corporations and the amount expended by him on account of his duties relating to corporations.

History.

878, 4548.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Fees to be paid into treasury promptly, KRS

41.070

.

14.105.
Acceptance of electronic signatures.

The Secretary of State may accept electronic signatures to meet the filing requirements for a:

Corporation as required in KRS Chapter 271B;

Nonprofit corporation as required in KRS Chapter 273;

Professional service corporation as required in KRS Chapter 274;

Limited liability company as required in KRS Chapter 275;

Partnership as required in KRS Chapter 362;

Partnership as required in Subchapter 1 of KRS Chapter 362;

Limited partnership as required in Subchapter 2 of KRS Chapter 362;

Cooperative corporations and associations as required in KRS Chapter 272 or 272A;

Business trust as required in KRS Chapter 386 or a statutory trust under KRS Chapter 386A;

Rural electric and rural telephone cooperative corporation as required in KRS Chapter 279;

Unincorporated nonprofit association as required in KRS Chapter 273A;

Assumed name filing under KRS Chapter 365; and

Filings under KRS Chapter 14A.

The electronic signature shall satisfy the requirements set forth in KRS

369.101

to

369.120

.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 2004, ch. 136, §
1, effective July 13, 2004; 2007, ch. 137, §
41, effective June 26, 2007; repealed and reenact., Acts 2010, ch. 51, §
41, effective July 15, 2010; 2011, ch. 29, § 3, effective June 8, 2011; 2012, ch. 160, § 133, effective July 12, 2012; 2015 ch. 34, § 1, effective June 24, 2015.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(7/15/2010).
2010 Ky. Acts ch. 51, sec. 183, provides, “The specific textual provisions of Sections 1 to 178 of this Act which reflect amendments made to those sections by
2007 Ky. Acts ch. 137 shall be deemed effective as of June 26, 2007, and those provisions are hereby made expressly retroactive to that date, with the remainder of the text of those sections being unaffected by the provisions of this section.”

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Bench & Bar.

Rutledge, Recent Amendments to Kentucky Business Entity Laws, Vol. 71, No. 5, Sept. 2007, Ky. Bench & Bar 25.

Kentucky Law Journal.

Rutledge, The 2007 Amendments to the Kentucky Business Entity Statutes,
97 Ky. L.J. 229 (2008).

14.110.
Compensation of Secretary of State and Assistant. [Repealed.]

14.120.
Clerical services.

Within the limits of the appropriation of his department, the Secretary of State may employ as many clerks as he deems necessary for the proper performance of his official duties.

History.

878.

14.130.
Bond of Secretary of State. [Repealed.]

14.140.
Trust fund to establish, operate, and maintain procedures required by KRS Chapter 275 and KRS 362.555 to 362.605 — Expiration of section on July 15, 1996.

There is hereby established a trust fund in the Treasury of the Commonwealth for use by the Secretary of State. The Secretary of State shall use the trust fund solely to establish, operate, and maintain procedures required by KRS Chapter 275 and KRS

362.555

to

362.605

. The Secretary of State may request, and the request shall be honored, that the funds be invested and reinvested to establish, operate, and maintain procedures required by KRS Chapter 275 and KRS

362.555

to

362.605

.

The trust fund shall be credited with fees generated pursuant to KRS

275.055

and 362.555(3) as well as income from the investment and reinvestment of funds in the trust fund.

The provisions of this section shall expire two (2) years from July 15, 1994. At that time, funds remaining in the trust fund shall revert to the general fund.

History.

Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 389, § 108, effective July 15, 1994.

2022-2024 Budget Reference.

See State/Executive Branch Budget,
2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. I, A, 15, (1) at 1642.

14.150.
Kentucky Lien Information System. [Repealed.]

14.210.
Division of Business and Professional Regulation. [Repealed.]

14.220.
Functions of division. [Repealed.]

14.230.
Transfer of funds and facilities to division. [Repealed.]

14.250.
One-stop business portal — Advisory committee — Assessment, recommendations, and duties.

The Secretary of State, Finance and Administration Cabinet, the Cabinet for Economic Development, and the Commonwealth Office of Technology shall jointly establish a one-stop electronic business portal that shall serve as a single, unified entry point for business owners to access and complete initial and ongoing state services and requirements in relation to the creation or ongoing operation of a business located in the Commonwealth of Kentucky. The agencies identified in this subsection shall coordinate, manage, and implement the portal based on the results of an assessment conducted by the One-Stop Business Portal Advisory Committee under subsection (3) of this section.

The One-Stop Business Portal Advisory Committee is hereby established to provide guidance in the creation and implementation of the one-stop business portal. The committee shall consist of the Secretary of State, the secretary of the Governor’s Executive Cabinet, the secretary of the Economic Development Cabinet or his or her designee, the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet or his or her designee, the secretary of the Education and Labor Cabinet or his or her designee, the secretary of the Public Protection Cabinet or his or her designee, the secretary of the Transportation Cabinet or his or her designee, the secretary of the Tourism, Arts and Heritage Cabinet or his or her designee, and the secretary of the Energy and Environment Cabinet or his or her designee. The Governor may appoint other members to the committee at his or her discretion. The committee shall be co-chaired by the Secretary of State and the secretary of the Governor’s Executive Cabinet.

The One-Stop Business Portal Advisory Committee shall prepare an assessment detailing recommendations for the creation, ongoing operation, and management of the one-stop business portal, to be presented to the Governor, the Secretary of State, and the Legislative Research Commission by December 31, 2011. This assessment shall include the following:

An estimate of the costs for full implementation of the portal, including those associated with technology, maintenance, sharing agency data, information security, and other start-up costs;

An estimate of the costs of establishing and maintaining a call center staffed with persons trained to answer questions and help businesses obtain information and services, along with a recommendation as to where the call center should be located and the number of staff necessary to operate it;

Recommendations on the location, design, and functionality of the portal;

Recommendations as to the roles of the state agencies identified in subsection (1) of this section regarding the day-to-day operational management of the portal;

Recommendations on the time line for developing and testing the portal;

Identification of any statutory or regulatory changes that need to be made to existing law to effectuate the portal’s functionality;

Identification of other state agencies that possess business-related functions and content so that those functions can be added to the portal;

Identification of any impediments posed by federal law and recommended ways to address the impediment;

A comprehensive analysis of the processes of all state agencies, with a view toward streamlining and reducing the paperwork necessary for businesses to interact with each agency; and

Recommendations on the scope of services to be provided by the portal. At a minimum, services shall include:

Application and renewal of business-related licenses and fees incident to the start-up and operation of a business;

Electronic payment of taxes and related costs imposed by state law incident to the operation of a business;

Filing of documents and papers imposed by state law associated with the operation of a business; and

Creation of individual electronic accounts for each business which allows the business to monitor its filings, payments, and other business- compliance activities.

The One-Stop Business Portal Advisory Committee shall:

Ensure that the portal has a Web site and the ability to process new business registrations as handled by the Secretary of State’s Office, and will be in a testing phase for the Department of Revenue’s tax registration application by December 31, 2012; and

Ensure that subsequent and additional online business applications maintained by the Commonwealth shall be evaluated and prioritized.

History.

Enact. Acts 2011, ch. 75, § 1, effective March 16, 2011; 2022 ch. 236, § 12, effective July 1, 2022.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(3/16/2011). As created by 2011 Ky. Acts ch. 75, sec. 1, this statute contained a reference to the “Education and Workforce Cabinet” in subsection (2). However, the entity created by Executive Order 2008-530, which was confirmed by the General Assembly in 2009 Ky. Acts ch. 11, is the Education and Workforce Development Cabinet. This manifest clerical or typographical error and a manifest grammatical error in subsection (4) have been corrected in codification by the Reviser of Statutes pursuant to KRS

7.136

.

14.255.
Creation of unique Commonwealth business identification number — Cooperation among state agencies in support of establishment of one-stop electronic business portal — Timeline.

To help facilitate data sharing between state agencies and as part of the ongoing establishment of a one-stop electronic business portal, the Secretary of State, the Finance and Administration Cabinet, the Cabinet for Economic Development, the Education and Labor Cabinet, and the Commonwealth Office of Technology shall jointly establish a unique Commonwealth business identification number which can be used in filings and services provided by the business portal.

By December 31, 2013, the agencies identified in subsection (1) of this section shall:

Recommend a timeline for implementing the new business identification numbering system for new business filings; and

Establish a five (5) year timeline for all state agencies to utilize the Commonwealth business identification number to facilitate data sharing and continued growth of services provided by the business portal.

History.

Enact. Acts 2013, ch. 65, § 1, effective June 25, 2013; 2022 ch. 236, § 13, effective July 1, 2022.

14.260.
Address protection program — Substitute address — Address protection program fund.

As funds are available, the Secretary of State, or designee, shall promulgate administrative regulations to expand the address protection program to allow an applicant or specified guardians to apply to have a substitute address designated to serve as the address of the participant. Any program created under this section shall:

Collaborate with the Kentucky Commission on Women;

Establish criteria to prohibit certain individuals, including any individual required to register as a sex offender, from participation in the program;

Allow a participant to request that state and local agencies use the substitute address as the address of the participant, but agencies may show that they have a bona fide statutory or administrative requirement for the actual address;

Be open to individuals that are victims of domestic violence and abuse, stalking, any victim of an offense or an attempt to commit an offense defined in KRS Chapter 510,

530.020

, 530.064(1)(a),

531.310

, or

531.320

, or any victim of a similar federal offense or a similar offense from another state or territory;

Allow an applicant to submit evidence, including a sworn statement, to show that he or she is a victim of a qualifying offense.

Participation in any program established under this section shall not affect custody or visitation orders in effect prior to or established during program participation, nor shall it constitute evidence of any offense and shall not be considered for purposes of making an order allocating parental responsibilities or parenting time.

No actionable duty nor any right of action shall accrue against the state, any entity operating an address protection program for the state, an individual operating in his or her professional capacity on behalf of the confidential address protection program established in this section, or an employee of the state or municipality in the event of negligent acts that result in the disclosure of a program participant’s actual address.

The address protection program fund is hereby created as a separate trust fund in the State Treasury. The address protection program fund shall consist of amounts received from fees collected pursuant to KRS

23A.208

and

24A.178

, amounts received from appropriations, and any other proceeds from gifts, grants, federal funds, or any other funds, both public and private, made available for the purposes of this section.

The address protection program fund shall be administered by the Secretary of State to operate and maintain the confidential address protection program established in this section.

Notwithstanding KRS

45.229

, address protection program fund amounts not expended at the close of a fiscal year shall not lapse but shall be carried forward into the next fiscal year.

Any interest earnings of the address protection program fund shall become a part of the address protection program fund and shall not lapse.

Moneys deposited in the address protection program fund are hereby appropriated for the purposes set forth in this section and shall not be appropriated or transferred by the General Assembly for any other purposes.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 2013, ch. 118, § 17, effective June 25, 2013; 2015 ch. 101, § 3, effective June 24, 2015.

2022-2024 Budget Reference.

See State/Executive Branch Budget, 2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. I, A, 8, (1) at 1638.